Missouri, session 2026, HB3204.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 135.2100, to read as follows:
135.2100. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Contribution", a donation of cash, stock, bonds, or other marketable
securities, or real property;
(2) "Director", the director of the department of mental health;
(3) "Prevention resource center", an entity that is part of the Missouri
department of mental health's prevention resource center network;
(4) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise due under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(5) "Taxpayer", a person, firm, a partner in a firm, corporation, or a
shareholder in an S corporation doing business in the state of Missouri and subject to
the state income tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143, or an individual subject
to the state income tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143, or any charitable
organization that is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri unrelated
business taxable income, if any, would be subject to the state income tax imposed under
chapter 143.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a taxpayer shall be
allowed to claim a tax credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount equal
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3204 2
to seventy percent of the amount such taxpayer contributed to a prevention resource
center.
3. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall not exceed the amount of the
taxpayer's state tax liability for the tax year for which the credit is claimed, and such
taxpayer shall not be allowed to claim a tax credit in excess of fifty thousand dollars per
tax year. Except for any excess credit which is carried over under subsection 5 of this
section, a taxpayer shall not be allowed to claim a tax credit unless the total amount of
such taxpayer's contribution or contributions to a prevention resource center or centers
in such taxpayer's tax year has a value of at least fifty dollars.
4. The cumulative amount of tax credits allowed to all taxpayers under this
section shall not exceed two million five hundred thousand dollars per tax year. If the
amount of tax credits claimed in a tax year under this section exceeds two million five
hundred thousand dollars, tax credits shall be allowed based on the order in which they
are claimed.
5. Any amount of tax credit that exceeds the tax due or that is applied for and
otherwise eligible for issuance but not issued shall not be refunded but may be carried
over to any subsequent tax year, not to exceed a total of five years.
6. No tax credit claimed under this section shall be assigned, transferred, sold, or
otherwise conveyed.
7. The director shall determine, at least annually, which facilities in this state
may be classified as prevention resource centers. The director may require of a facility
seeking to be classified as a prevention resource center whatever information is
reasonably necessary to make such a determination.
8. The director shall establish a procedure by which a taxpayer can determine if
a facility has been classified as a prevention resource center. Prevention resource
centers shall be permitted to decline a contribution from a taxpayer. A taxpayer shall
apply for the tax credit authorized under this section by attaching a copy of the
contribution verification provided by a prevention resource center to such taxpayer's
income tax return.
9. Each prevention resource center shall provide information to the director
concerning the identity of each taxpayer making a contribution to the prevention
resource center who is claiming a tax credit under this section and the amount of the
contribution. The director shall provide the information to the director of revenue. The
director shall be subject to the confidentiality and penalty provisions of section 32.057
relating to the disclosure of tax information.
10. Notwithstanding any provision of section 105.1500 to the contrary, any
requirement to provide information, documents, or records under this section, and any

HCS HB 3204 3
requirement established by the department to provide information, documents, or
records for the purpose of administering and enforcing this section, shall be exempt
from section 105.1500.
11. In the event a full or partial credit denial due to the cumulative maximum
amount of credits being redeemed for the tax year causes an income-tax balance due to
be owed to the state by the taxpayer, the taxpayer shall not be held liable for any
addition to tax, penalty, or interest on that income-tax balance due, provided the
balance is paid, or approved payment arrangements are made, within sixty days from
issuance of the notice of credit denial.
12. The department of revenue, in coordination with the department of mental
health, shall promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the administration of
this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that
is created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
13. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall sunset
six years after the effective date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset; and
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a taxpayer from claiming a tax credit
properly issued before this program was sunset in a tax year after the program is sunset.
✔